Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.07.020

Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the following words and terms shall have the following meanings, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) "Authority" means the Washington higher education facilities authority created under RCW 28B.07.030 or any board, body, commission, department or officer succeeding to the principal functions of the authority or to whom the powers conferred upon the authority shall be given by law.

(2) "Bonds" means bonds, notes, commercial paper, certificates of indebtedness, or other evidences of indebtedness of the authority issued under this chapter.

(3) "Bond resolution" means any resolution of the authority, adopted under this chapter, authorizing the issuance and sale of bonds.

(4) "Higher education institution" means a private, nonprofit educational institution, the main campus of which is permanently situated in the state, which is open to residents of the state, which neither restricts entry on racial or religious grounds, which provides programs of education beyond high school leading at least to the baccalaureate degree, and which is accredited by the Northwest Association of Schools and Colleges or by an accrediting association recognized by the council for higher education.

(5) "Participant" means a higher education institution which, under this chapter, undertakes the financing of a project or projects or undertakes the refunding or refinancing of obligations, mortgages, or advances previously incurred for a project or projects.

(6) "Project" means any land or any improvement, including, but not limited to, buildings, structures, fixtures, utilities, machinery, excavations, paving, and landscaping, and any interest in such land or improvements, and any personal property pertaining or useful to such land and improvements, which are necessary, useful, or convenient for the operation of a higher education institution, including but not limited to, the following: Dormitories or other multiunit housing facilities for students, faculty, officers, or employees; dining halls; student unions; administration buildings; academic buildings; libraries; laboratories; research facilities; computer facilities; classrooms; athletic facilities; health care facilities; maintenance, storage, or utility facilities; parking facilities; or any combination thereof, or any other structures, facilities, or equipment so related.

(7) "Project cost" means any cost related to the acquisition, construction, improvement, alteration, or rehabilitation by a participant or the authority of any project and the financing of the project through the authority, including, but not limited to, the following costs paid or incurred: Costs of acquisition of land or interests in land and any improvement; costs of contractors, builders, laborers, material suppliers, and suppliers of tools and equipment; costs of surety and performance bonds; fees and disbursements of architects, surveyors, engineers, feasibility consultants, accountants, attorneys, financial consultants, and other professionals; interest on bonds issued by the authority during any period of construction; principal of and interest on interim financing of any project; debt service reserve funds; depreciation funds, costs of the initial start-up operation of any project; fees for title insurance, document recording, or filing; fees of trustees and the authority; taxes and other governmental charges levied or assessed on any project; and any other similar costs. Except as specifically set forth in this definition, the term "project cost" does not include books, fuel, supplies, and similar items which are required to be treated as a current expense under generally accepted accounting principles.

(8) "Trust indenture" means any agreement, trust indenture, or other similar instrument by and between the authority and one or more corporate trustees.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 136; 2007 c 218 s 86; 1985 c 370 s 47; 1983 c 169 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 11 ss 101-103, 106-202, 204-244, and 301: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 11: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Intent—Finding—2007 c 218: See note following RCW 41.08.020.